Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6907
Group health plan, defined.

Group health plan means an employee welfare benefit plan as defined by 29 U.S.C. 1002 to the extent that the plan provides any hospital, surgical, or medical expense benefits to employees or their dependents, as defined under the terms of the plan, directly or through insurance, reimbursement, or otherwise.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 7.